Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 14
COMPOSITION OR ADJUSTMENT
OF INDEBTEDNESS
OF LOCAL TAXING DISTRICTS

32-1-1401. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares this part 14 to be necessary in order to provide for the orderly and equitable payment of the obligations of local taxing districts organized under the provisions of this article, which payment may be effected by a plan of adjustment of the debts of such taxing districts under the federal bankruptcy law. The general assembly further declares that the necessity of such taxing districts availing themselves of the provisions of the federal bankruptcy law results from unanticipated economic and fiscal conditions affecting such taxing districts, rendering such taxing districts unable to discharge their indebtedness as the same becomes due and imposing a severe hardship on the taxpayers therein to the detriment not only of the credit of such taxing districts and that of all political subdivisions of the state of Colorado but also of the creditors of such taxing districts.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1508, § 1, effective May 24.

32-1-1402. Definitions.

As used in this part 14, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Federal bankruptcy law" means chapter 9 of title 11, U.S.C., as the same may be from time to time amended, or any act of congress relating to the adjustment or composition of indebtedness of municipalities enacted pursuant to article I, section 8, clause 4, of the United States constitution concerning uniform laws on the subject of bankruptcy.

"Insolvent taxing district" means a taxing district which is able to show to the United States bankruptcy court in and for the district of Colorado that it has been unsuccessful with other existing alternatives to bankruptcy and which would be unable to discharge its obligations as they become due by means of a mill levy of not less than one hundred mills to be imposed by:

The taxing district; or

Any other taxing district pursuant to a contract which pledges the revenues of such contract to the payment of such obligations.

"Plan" means a plan for the adjustment of the debtor's debts under federal bankruptcy law filed by an insolvent taxing district.

"Taxing district" means a special district which is organized or acting under the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1508, § 1, effective May 24.

32-1-1403. Petition.

Any insolvent taxing district is hereby authorized to file a petition authorized by federal bankruptcy law and to take any and all action necessary or proper to carry out the plan filed with said petition, or any modification of such plan thereafter accepted in writing by said district, if such original or modified plan is approved pursuant to federal bankruptcy law.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1509, § 1, effective May 24.

32-1-1403.5. Notice and hearing by board.

The board shall file a petition under section 32-1-1403 only at a regular or special meeting after publication of notice and postcard or letter notification to property owners within the district and to the division of local government in the department of local affairs of the place, time, and date of such meeting and such proposed action. Postcard or letter notification shall be mailed to property owners within the special district, as listed on the records of the county assessor on the date requested, not less than ten days prior to such meeting.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 794, § 22, effective June 4.

32-1-1404. Powers.

The plan may include provisions for the modification of the existing contracts of the taxing district as evidenced by its bonds or otherwise. Such plan may adapt or alter the procedures provided by the statutes of Colorado for the levy, certification, and collection of general taxes to conform to the provisions of the court approved plan of adjustment, in accordance with federal bankruptcy law; except that nothing in this part 14 shall be construed to impair the rights of persons who have purchased property at tax sale. If the court approved plan provides for the issuance of new obligations of such taxing district for delivery to the creditors of the taxing district in exchange for outstanding obligations of such taxing district, such new obligations may be issued on the terms or conditions found in the plan of adjustment, regardless of any contrary state statute. Nothing in this part 14 shall impair the claims which creditors may have against persons who are not subject to jurisdiction of the court pursuant to chapter 9 of title 11, U.S.C. Any such plan proposed may provide for payments to creditors on terms and conditions which differ from the original contract if the present value of the total payments under the provisions of the plan do not exceed the present value of the total payments under the original contract.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1509, § 1, effective May 24.

32-1-1405. Powers not limited by this part 14.

The enumeration of powers in this part 14 shall not exclude powers not mentioned and elsewhere conferred which may be necessary for or incidental to the accomplishment of the purposes of this part 14 and the consummation of a plan approved as provided in this part 14.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1509, § 1, effective May 24.

32-1-1406. Validation of bankruptcy filings and approvals.

The filing of a petition or a plan under the federal bankruptcy law by an insolvent taxing district prior to May 24, 1990, the approval of the plan of an insolvent taxing district prior to May 24, 1990, and any proceedings related to any such filing or approval are hereby validated.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1509, § 1, effective May 24.

32-1-1407. Repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1510, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 93:

Entire section repealed, p. 225, § 1, effective March 31.